Washington statutes.
RCW 39.104.030

Conditions.

A local government may finance public improvements using local revitalization financing subject to the following conditions:

(1) The local government has adopted an ordinance designating a revitalization area within its boundaries and specified the public improvements proposed to be financed in whole or in part with the use of local revitalization financing;

(2) The public improvements proposed to be financed in whole or in part using local revitalization financing are expected to encourage private development within the revitalization area and to increase the fair market value of real property within the revitalization area;

(3) The local government has entered into a contract with a private developer relating to the development of private improvements within the revitalization area or has received a letter of intent from a private developer relating to the developer's plans for the development of private improvements within the revitalization area;

(4) Private development that is anticipated to occur within the revitalization area, as a result of the public improvements, will be consistent with the countywide planning policy adopted by the county under RCW 36.70A.210 and the local government's comprehensive plan and development regulations adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW;

(5) The local government may not use local revitalization financing to finance the costs associated with the financing, design, acquisition, construction, equipping, operating, maintaining, remodeling, repairing, and reequipping of public facilities funded with taxes collected under RCW 82.14.048 or 82.14.390;

(6) The governing body of the local government must make a finding that local revitalization financing:

(a) Will not be used for the purpose of relocating a business from outside the revitalization area, but within this state, into the revitalization area unless convincing evidence is provided that the firm being relocated would otherwise leave the state;

(b) Will improve the viability of existing business entities within the revitalization area; and

(c) Will be used exclusively in areas within the jurisdiction of the local government deemed in need of either economic development or redevelopment, or both, and absent the financing available under this chapter and RCW 82.14.510 and 82.14.515 the proposed economic development or redevelopment would more than likely not occur; and

(7) The governing body of the local government finds that the public improvements proposed to be financed in whole or in part using local revitalization financing are reasonably likely to:

(a) Increase private investment within the revitalization area;

(b) Increase employment within the revitalization area; and

(c) Generate, over the period of time that the local sales and use tax will be imposed under RCW 82.14.510, increases in state and local property, sales, and use tax revenues that are equal to or greater than the respective state and local contributions made under this chapter.

[ 2009 c 270 s 103.]